Wyoming, session 2026, SF0004.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. For the period beginning July 1, 2026 and
ending June 30, 2028, services authorized under the Wyoming
Medical Assistance and Services Act involving emergency
medical services provided by ground ambulance service
providers shall be reimbursed at one hundred percent (100%)
of the current Medicare rate, not to exceed one hundred
percent (100%) of the provider's or department's usual and
customary billed charges. The department of health shall
develop enhanced Medicaid rural and super-rural fee
schedules for emergency medical services provided by ground
ambulance service providers. These reimbursement rates
shall apply if the services were rendered during the period
beginning July 1, 2026 and ending June 30, 2028.
Section 2. The department of health shall report to
the joint appropriations committee and the joint labor,
health and social services interim committee on or before
October 31, 2027 regarding the additional costs incurred by
the increased reimbursement rates required by this act. The
report required by this section shall include any
recommendations for modifications to the reimbursement
rates for emergency medical services provided by ground
ambulance providers under the Wyoming Medical Assistance
and Services Act.
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0004
ENROLLED ACT NO. 34, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 3. There is appropriated one million three
hundred thousand dollars ($1,300,000.00) from the general
fund and one million three hundred thousand dollars
($1,300,000.00) from federal funds to the department of
health for purposes of increasing the reimbursement rates
for services as provided by this act. This appropriation
shall be for the period beginning July 1, 2026 and ending
June 30, 2028. This appropriation shall not be transferred
or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended,
unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall
revert as provided by law on June 30, 2028. It is the
intent of the legislature that this appropriation be
included in the standard budget for the department of
health for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0004
ENROLLED ACT NO. 34, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
3